ava_nouns_.lexd
<nt><sg><nom>:учӏ  
<nt><sg><erg>:учӏ>алъ  
<nt><sg><erg>:очӏ>оца  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><gen>:учӏ>алъул  
<nt><sg><gen>:очӏ>ол  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:учӏ>але  
<nt><sg>:учӏ>ал{ъ}  
<nt><sg>:очӏ>ол  # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><nom>:учӏ>ал  
<nt><pl><erg>:учӏ>аз  
<nt><pl><gen>:учӏ>азул  
<nt><pl><dat>:учӏ>азе  
<nt><pl>:учӏ>аз  

LEXICON N-GIOR

<nt><sg><nom>:ор  
<nt><sg><erg>:ор>алъ  
<nt><sg><erg>:ур>уца  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><gen>:ор>алъул  
<nt><sg><gen>:ур>ул  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:ор>алъе  
<nt><sg>:ор>ал{ъ}  
<nt><pl><nom>:ор>ал  
<nt><pl><erg>:ор>аз  
<nt><pl><gen>:ор>азул  
<nt><pl><dat>:ор>азе  
<nt><pl>:ор>аз  

LEXICON N-LEL

<nt><sg><nom>:ел  
<nt><sg><erg>:ел>алъ  
<nt><sg><gen>:ел>алъул  
<nt><sg><gen>:ал>ил  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:ел>алъе  
<nt><sg>:>ел{ъ}  
<nt><pl><nom>:ул>дул  
<nt><pl><erg>:ул>дуз  
<nt><pl><gen>:ул>дузул  
<nt><pl><dat>:ул>дузе  
<nt><pl>:ул>дуз  

LEXICON N-MAGINA

<nt><sg><nom>:  
<nt><sg><erg>:>ялъ  
<nt><sg><gen>:>ялъул  
<nt><sg><gen>:>дул  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:>ялъе  
<nt><sg>:>ял{ъ}  
<nt><pl><nom>:>би  
<nt><pl><erg>:>бица  
<nt><pl><gen>:>базул  
<nt><pl><dat>:>базе  
<nt><pl>:>баз  

LEXICON N-GIAKLU

<nt><sg><nom>:у  
<nt><sg><erg>:у>ялъ  
<nt><sg><gen>:у>ялъул  
<nt><sg><dat>:у>ялъе  
<nt><sg>:у>ял{ъ}  
<nt><pl><nom>:>аби  
<nt><pl><erg>:>абаз  
<nt><pl><gen>:>абазул  
<nt><pl><gen>:у>ялъулъ  
<nt><pl><dat>:>абазе  
<nt><pl>:>абаз  

LEXICON N-XIUKMU

<nt><sg><nom>:у  
<nt><sg><erg>:у>ялъ  
<nt><sg><gen>:у>ялъул  
<nt><sg><gen>:у>дул  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:у>ялъе  
<nt><sg>:у>ял{ъ}  
<nt><pl><nom>:>аби  
<nt><pl><erg>:>абаз  
<nt><pl><gen>:>абазул  
<nt><pl><gen>:у>ялъулъ  
<nt><pl><dat>:>абазе  
<nt><pl>:>абаз  

LEXICON N-GIARAC

<nt><sg><nom>:ац  
<nt><sg><erg>:ц>уца  
<nt><sg><gen>:ц>ул  
<nt><sg><dat>:ц>уе  
<nt><sg>:ц>у  
#<n><nt><pl><nom>:>аби  
#<n><nt><pl><erg>:>абица  
#<n><nt><pl><gen>:>абазул  
#<n><nt><pl><gen>:у>ялъулъ  
#<n><nt><pl><dat>:>абазе  
#<n><nt><pl>:>абаз  

LEXICON N-GIELMU

<nt><sg><nom>:у  
<nt><sg><erg>:у>ялъ  
<nt><sg><gen>:у>ялъул  
<nt><sg><dat>:у>ялъе  
<nt><sg>:у>ял{ъ}  
<nt><pl><nom>:>аби  
<nt><pl><erg>:>абица  
<nt><pl><gen>:>абазул  
<nt><pl><gen>:у>ялъулъ  
<nt><pl><dat>:>абазе  
<nt><pl>:>абаз  

LEXICON N-STOL-ABS-SG
<nt><sg><nom>: 

LEXICON N-STOL-OBL-SG 
<nt><sg><obl>:{a}л{ъ} 

LEXICON N-STOL-ABS-PL
<nt><pl><nom>:{a}л

LEXICON N-STOL-OBL-PL
<nt><pl><obl>:{a}з

LEXICON N-STOL-ERG
<nt><pl><erg>:{a}ца

LEXICON N-NAJIXAN-DECL-SG

<sg><nom>:н
<sg><erg>:н{a}с
<sg><gen>:н{a}сул 
<sg><dat>:н{a}се 
<sg>:н{a}с

LEXICON N-NAJIXAN-DECL-PL

<pl><nom>:би
<pl><erg>:баз
<pl><gen>:базул
<pl><dat>:базе 
<pl>:баз

LEXICON N-AHIHAN # <m>: N-NAJIXAN-DECL-SG <mf>: N-NAJIXAN-DECL-PL 

<f><sg><nom>:н  
<f><sg><erg>:н>{a}лъ  
<f><sg><gen>:н>{a}лъу   # check
<f><sg><dat>:н>{a}лъе  
<f><sg>:н>{a}л{ъ}

LEXICON N-XVADARUXAN # <m>: N-NAJIXAN-DECL-SG <mf>: N-NAJIXAN-DECL-PL 

<f><sg><nom>:н  
<f><sg><erg>:н>{a}лъ  
<f><sg><gen>:н>{a}лъул 
<f><sg><dat>:н>{a}лъе  
<f><sg>:н>{a}л{ъ}

LEXICON N-OBSHCHESTVO

<nt><sg><nom>:о  
<nt><sg><erg>:о>{a}лъ  
<nt><sg><gen>:о>{a}лъул  
<nt><sg><dat>:о>{a}лъе  
<nt><sg>:о>{a}л{ъ}  
<nt><pl><nom>:а>би  
<nt><pl><erg>:а>баз  
<nt><pl><gen>:а>базул  
<nt><pl><dat>:а>базе  
<nt><pl>:а>ба  

LEXICON N-GIOLILAV-DECL

<m><sg><nom>:в
<m><sg><erg>:с
<m><sg><gen>:сул
<m><sg><dat>:се
<m><sg>:с 
<f><sg><nom>:й
<f><sg><erg>:лъ
<f><sg><gen>:лъул
<f><sg><dat>:лъе
<f><sg>:л{ъ} 
<mf><pl><nom>:л
<mf><pl><erg>:з
<mf><pl><gen>:зул 
<mf><pl><dat>:зе
<mf><pl>:з 

LEXICON N-ASKARIJAV

<m><sg><nom>:в
<m><sg><erg>:с
<m><sg><gen>:сул
<m><sg><dat>:се
<m><sg>:с
<mf><pl><nom>:л
<mf><pl><erg>:з
<mf><pl><gen>:зул
<mf><pl><dat>:зе
<mf><pl>:з

LEXICON N-GIUMRU # по типу N-STOL

<nt><sg><gen>:>дул   # Dir/LR

LEXICON N-RAKI # :акӏ N-STOL ; 

<nt><sg><erg>:>екӏеца   # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><gen>:>екӏел   # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:>екӏее   # Dir/LR
<nt><sg>:>екӏе   # Dir/LR

LEXICON N-ROH

<nt><sg><nom>:  
<nt><sg><erg>:>{a}лъ  
<nt><sg><gen>:>ил  
<nt><sg><dat>:>{a}лъе  
<nt><sg>:>{a}л{ъ}  
<nt><pl><nom>:>{a}л  
<nt><pl><erg>:>{a}ца  
<nt><pl><gen>:>{a}зул  
<nt><pl><dat>:>{a}зе  
<nt><pl>:>{a}з  

LEXICON N-NUX

<nt><sg><nom>:  
<nt><sg><erg>:>{a}лъ  
<nt><sg><gen>:>лул  
<nt><sg><dat>:>{a}лъе  
<nt><sg>:  
<nt><pl><nom>:>{a}л  
<nt><pl><erg>:>{a}ца  
<nt><pl><gen>:>{a}зул  
<nt><pl><dat>:>{a}зе  
<nt><pl>:>{a}з  

LEXICON N-MUX # N-NUX ; 

<nt><sg><gen>:>алъул  # Dir/LR

LEXICON N-SHAHAR # :ар N-STOL ;

<nt><pl><nom>:р>{a²}би    # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><erg>:р>{a²}баца   # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><gen>:р>{a²}базул   # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><dat>:р>{a²}базе   # Dir/LR
<nt><pl>:р>{a²}баз   # Dir/LR

LEXICON N-GIALAX

<nt><sg><nom>:ах  
<nt><sg><erg>:ах>{a}лъ  
<nt><sg><gen>:>хул  
<nt><sg><gen>:ах>{a}лъул  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:>хуле  
<nt><sg><dat>:ах>{a}лъе  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg>:ах>{a}л{ъ}  
<nt><pl><nom>:>хал  
<nt><pl><erg>:>хаца  
<nt><pl><gen>:>хазул  
<nt><pl><dat>:>хазе  
<nt><pl>:>хаз  

LEXICON N-XANZHU-ABS
<nt><sg><nom>:у

LEXICON N-XANZHU-OBL
<nt><sg><erg>:>даца  
<nt><sg><gen>:>дал  
<nt><sg><dat>:>дале

LEXICON N-XANZHU-LOC
<nt><sg>:>дал  

LEXICON N-CCIN-ABS
<nt><sg><nom>:н

LEXICON N-CCIN-OBL
<nt><sg><erg>:>даца  
<nt><sg><gen>:>дал  
<nt><sg><dat>:>дале

LEXICON N-CCIN-LOC
<nt><sg>:а>дал

LEXICON N-LIM

<nt><sg><nom>:им  
<nt><sg><erg>:а>даца  
<nt><sg><erg>:е>ца  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><gen>:а>дал  
<nt><sg><gen>:>лъел  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:а>дале  
<nt><sg>:а>дал  
<nt><pl><nom>:ин>{a}л  
<nt><pl><erg>:ин>{a}ца  
<nt><pl><gen>:ин>{a}зул  
<nt><pl><dat>:ин>{a}зе  
<nt><pl>:ин>{a}з  

LEXICON N-QVATI

<nt><sg><nom>:  
<nt><sg><erg>:>{a}лъ  
<nt><sg><gen>:>{a}лъул  
<nt><sg><gen>:>ул  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:>{a}лъе  
<nt><sg><dat>:>уле   # Dir/LR
<nt><sg>:>{a}л{ъ}  
<nt><pl><nom>:>{a}л  
<nt><pl><erg>:>{a}з  
<nt><pl><gen>:>{a}зул  
<nt><pl><dat>:>{a}зе  
<nt><pl>:>{a}з  

LEXICON N-MAZGAR

<nt><sg><nom>:  
<nt><sg><erg>:>{a}лъ  
<nt><sg><gen>:>{a}лъул  
<nt><sg><gen>:>ул  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:>{a}лъе  
<nt><sg><dat>:>уле   # Dir/LR
<nt><sg>:>{a}л{ъ}  

LEXICON N-MESED

<nt><sg><nom>:  
<nt><sg><erg>:>{a}лъ  
<nt><sg><gen>:>{a}лъул  
<nt><sg><gen>:>ил  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:>{a}лъе  
<nt><sg><dat>:>иле   # Dir/LR
<nt><sg>:>{a}л{ъ}  
<nt><pl><nom>:>{a}л  
#<n><nt><pl><erg>:>{a}ца  
<nt><pl><erg>:>{a}з  
<nt><pl><gen>:>{a}зул  
<nt><pl><dat>:>{a}зе  
<nt><pl>:>{a}з  

LEXICON N-SHAL

<nt><sg><nom>:  
<nt><sg><erg>:>{a}лъ  
<nt><sg><gen>:>{a}лъул  
<nt><sg><gen>:>ил  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:>{a}лъе  
<nt><sg><dat>:>иле   # Dir/LR
<nt><sg>:>{a}л{ъ}  
<nt><pl><nom>:>{a}л  
<nt><pl><erg>:>{a}з  
<nt><pl><gen>:>{a}зул  
<nt><pl><dat>:>{a}зе  
<nt><pl>:>{a}з  

LEXICON N-SON # :он N-MESED ;

<nt><pl><nom>:ан>{a}л   # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><erg>:ан>{a}з  # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><gen>:ан>{a}зул  # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><dat>:ан>{a}зе  # Dir/LR
<nt><pl>:ан>{a}з  # Dir/LR

LEXICON N-GIECH

<nt><sg><nom>:  
<nt><sg><erg>:>алъ  
<nt><sg><erg>:>уца  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><gen>:>алъул  
<nt><sg><gen>:>ул  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:>уле  
<nt><sg>:>ал{ъ}  
<nt><sg>:>ул  # Dir/LR

LEXICON N-RAK 

<nt><sg><nom>:  
<nt><sg><erg>:>алъ  
<nt><sg><erg>:>уца  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><gen>:>алъул  
<nt><sg><gen>:>ул  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:>уле  
<nt><sg>:>ал{ъ}  
<nt><sg>:>ул  # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><nom>:>{a}л  
<nt><pl><erg>:>{a}з  
<nt><pl><gen>:>{a}зул  
<nt><pl><dat>:>{a}зе  
<nt><pl>:>{a}з  

LEXICON N-KANLI

<nt><sg><nom>:и  
<nt><sg><erg>:и>ялъ  
<nt><sg><gen>:и>ялъул  
<nt><sg><gen>:>ул  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:и>ялъе   
<nt><sg>:и>ял{ъ}  

LEXICON N-GIORXI

<nt><sg><nom>:и  
<nt><sg><erg>:и>ялъ  
<nt><sg><gen>:и>ялъул  
<nt><sg><gen>:и>дул  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:и>яле   
<nt><sg>:и>ял{ъ}  
<nt><pl><nom>:>аби  
<nt><pl><erg>:>абаз  
<nt><pl><gen>:>абазул  
<nt><pl><dat>:>абазе  
<nt><pl>:>абаз  

LEXICON N-NAX

<nt><sg><nom>:  
<nt><sg><erg>:>уца  
<nt><sg><gen>:>ул  
<nt><sg><dat>:>уле  
<nt><sg>:>ул  # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><nom>:>{a}л  
<nt><pl><erg>:>{a}з  
<nt><pl><gen>:>{a}зул  
<nt><pl><dat>:>{a}зе  
<nt><pl>:>{a}з  

LEXICON N-RAGH

<nt><sg><nom>:  
<nt><sg><erg>:>алъ  
<nt><sg><erg>:>уца  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><gen>:>ул  
<nt><sg><dat>:>уле  
<nt><sg>:>ал{ъ}  
<nt><sg>:>ул  # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><nom>:>{a}л  
<nt><pl><erg>:>{a}з  
<nt><pl><gen>:>{a}зул  
<nt><pl><dat>:>{a}зе  
<nt><pl>:>{a}з  

LEXICON N-BAQ

<nt><sg><nom>:  
<nt><sg><erg>:>уца  
<nt><sg><gen>:>ул  
<nt><sg><dat>:>уле  
<nt><sg>:>ул  
#<n><nt><pl><nom>:>{a}л  
#<n><nt><pl><erg>:>{a}ца  
#<n><nt><pl><gen>:>{a}зул  
#<n><nt><pl><dat>:>{a}зе  
#<n><nt><pl>:>{a}з  

LEXICON N-RAH

<nt><sg><nom>:  
<nt><sg><erg>:>алъ  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><erg>:>даца  
<nt><sg><gen>:>дал  
<nt><sg><dat>:>дале  
<nt><sg>:>да  
<nt><sg>:>ал  # Dir/LR
#<n><nt><pl><nom>:>аби  
#<n><nt><pl><erg>:>{a}ца  
#<n><nt><pl><gen>:>{a}базул  
#<n><nt><pl><dat>:>{a}базе  
#<n><nt><pl>:>{a}баз  

LEXICON N-CHURI

<nt><sg><nom>:и  
<nt><sg><erg>:>уца  
<nt><sg><gen>:>ул  
<nt><sg><dat>:>уе  
#<n><nt><sg>:>ул  
<nt><sg>:>у  
<nt><pl><nom>:>аби  
<nt><pl><erg>:>{a}баз  
<nt><pl><gen>:>{a}базул  
<nt><pl><dat>:>{a}базе  
<nt><pl>:>{a}баз  

LEXICON N-DARAN-ABS-SG
<m><sg><nom>:ан

LEXICON N-DARAN-OBL-PL
<m><sg><obl>:ан>{a}л{ъ}

LEXICON N-DARAN-ABS-PL
<m><pl><nom>:м>{a}л

LEXICON N-DARAN-OBL-PL
<m><pl>:м>{a}з

LEXICON N-DARAN-CORE-CASES
<erg>:м>ица
<gen>:м>ил

LEXICON N-GIADAN-ABS-SG
<m><sg><nom>:н

LEXICON N-GIADAN-OBL-SG
<m><sg><obl>:м>{a}с

LEXICON N-GIADAN-ABS-PL
<m><pl><nom>:м>{a}л

LEXICON N-GIADAN-OBL-PL
<m><pl><obl>:м>{a}з

LEXICON N-XIZAN-ABS
<nt><sg><nom>:н
<nt><pl><nom>:м>{a}л 

LEXICON N-XIZAN-OBL
<nt><sg><erg>:м>{a}лъ  
<nt><sg><gen>:м>{a}лъул  
<nt><sg><dat>:м>{a}лъе
<nt><pl><erg>:м>{a}ца  
<nt><pl><gen>:м>{a}зул  
<nt><pl><dat>:м>{a}зе
<nt><sg><erg>:н>{a}лъ  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><gen>:н>{a}лъул  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:н>{a}лъе  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><erg>:н>{a}лъ  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><gen>:н>{a}лъул  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:н>{a}лъе  # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><nom>:н>{a}л  # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><erg>:н>{a}ца  # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><gen>:н>{a}зул  # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><dat>:н>{a}зе  # Dir/LR

LEXICON N-XIZAN-LOC
<nt><sg>:м>{a}л{ъ}
<nt><pl>:м>{a}з  
<nt><sg>:н>{a}л{ъ}  # Dir/LR
<nt><pl>:н>{a}з  # Dir/LR

LEXICON N-KAGHAT

<nt><sg><nom>:ат  
<nt><sg><erg>:т>ица  
<nt><sg><gen>:т>ил  
<nt><sg><dat>:т>иле  
<nt><sg>:т>и  
<nt><sg>:ат>ал{ъ}  # Dir/LR # Use/Sub
<nt><pl><nom>:т>ал  
<nt><pl><erg>:т>аз  
<nt><pl><gen>:т>азул  
<nt><pl><dat>:т>азе  
<nt><pl>:т>аз  

LEXICON N-URGHEL

<nt><sg><nom>:ел  
<nt><sg><erg>:ал>ица  
<nt><sg><gen>:ал>ил  
<nt><sg><dat>:ал>иле  
<nt><sg>:ал>ил  
<nt><pl><nom>:ал>аби  
<nt><pl><erg>:ал>абаз  
<nt><pl><gen>:ал>абазул  
<nt><pl><dat>:ал>абазе  
<nt><pl>:ал>абаз  

LEXICON N-RETIEL

<nt><sg><nom>:ел  
<nt><sg><erg>:л>ица  
<nt><sg><gen>:л>ил  
<nt><sg><dat>:л>иле  
<nt><sg>:л>ил  

LEXICON N-LAGHEL

<nt><sg><nom>:ел  
<nt><sg><erg>:ел>{a}лъ  
<nt><sg><erg>:ал>ица  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><gen>:ел>{a}лъул  
<nt><sg><gen>:ал>ил  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:ел>{a}лъе  
<nt><sg><dat>:ал>иле  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg>:ел>{a}л{ъ}  
<nt><pl><nom>:ел>{a}л  
<nt><pl><erg>:ел>{a}з  
<nt><pl><gen>:ел>{a}зул  
<nt><pl><dat>:ел>{a}зе  
<nt><pl>:ел>{a}з  

LEXICON N-RALAD

<nt><sg><nom>:ад  
<nt><sg><erg>:ад>{a}лъ  
<nt><sg><erg>:д>{a}ца  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><gen>:ад>{a}лъул  
<nt><sg><gen>:д>{a}лъул  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg><dat>:ад>{a}лъе  
<nt><sg><dat>:д>{a}лъе  # Dir/LR
<nt><sg>:ад>{a}л{ъ}  
<nt><pl><nom>:ад>{a}л  
<nt><pl><erg>:ад>{a}ца  
<nt><pl><gen>:ад>{a}зул  
<nt><pl><dat>:ад>{a}зе  
<nt><pl>:ад>{a}з  
<nt><pl><nom>:д>{a}л  # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><erg>:д>{a}ца  # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><gen>:д>{a}зул  # Dir/LR
<nt><pl><dat>:д>{a}зе  # Dir/LR
<nt><pl>:д>{a}з  # Dir/LR

LEXICON N-GHURUSH
